Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 16 View by Jury

9-16-1.
Court order for view.

In all cases in which it shall seem advisable to the court, on request of either party, a view by the jury may be ordered; and in all such cases, the court shall regulate the proceedings at the view and, in its discretion, accompany the jury.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 355; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 508, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-16-1

.

9-16-2.
Expenses of view.

To entitle himself or herself to a view, the party moving therefor shall advance such reasonable sum of money to the sheriff, to defray the expenses of the jury on the view, as the court shall order, and the amount of the expenses shall be taxed against the adverse party, if he or she who advanced the expenses shall recover costs in the suit.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 356; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 508, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-16-2

.